Washington, session 2025-2026, SB6261.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 1. A new section is added to chapter 28A.225 RCW to read as follows:(1) A parent who does not enroll his or her child in public or private school at age six must file a signed declaration of the parent's plan regarding the education of that child in the school year when the child turns six years of age and the school year when the child turns seven years of age. The declaration should include if they are or planning to, or currently receiving, home-based instruction or planning to enroll in public or private school.(2) The compulsory attendance requirements in RCW 28A.225.010 and the home-based instruction requirements in RCW 28A.200.010 are not applicable until a child receiving home-based instruction is eight years of age.(3) The signed declaration of intent must include the name and age of the child and must be written in a format prescribed by the superintendent of public instruction.(4) Each parent shall file the declaration of intent by September 15th of the school year or within two weeks of the beginning of any public school quarter, trimester, or semester with the superintendent of the public school district within which the parent resides.(5) For the purposes of this section, "parent" means a parent, guardian, or person having legal custody of a child.Sec. 2. RCW 28A.200.010 and 2019 c 252 s 109 are each amended to read as follows:(1) Each parent whose child is receiving home-based instruction under RCW 28A.225.010(4) shall have the duty to:(a) File annually a signed declaration of intent that he or she is planning to cause his or her child to receive home-based instruction, including the declaration of intent required in the school year the child turns six and seven years of age under section 1 of this act. The statement shall include the name and age of the child, shall specify whether a certificated person will be supervising the instruction, and shall be written in a format prescribed by the superintendent of public instruction. Each parent shall file the statement by September 15th of the school year or within two weeks of the beginning of any public school quarter, trimester, or semester with the superintendent of the public school district within which the parent resides or the district that accepts the transfer, and the student shall be deemed a transfer student of the nonresident district. Parents may apply for transfer under RCW 28A.225.220;(b) Ensure that test scores or annual academic progress assessments and immunization records, together with any other records that are kept relating to the instructional and educational activities provided, are forwarded to any other public or private school to which the child transfers. At the time of a transfer to a public school, the superintendent of the local school district in which the child enrolls may require a standardized achievement test to be administered and shall have the authority to determine the appropriate grade and course level placement of the child after consultation with parents and review of the child's records; and(c) Ensure that a standardized achievement test approved by the state board of education is administered annually to the child by a qualified individual or that an annual assessment of the student's academic progress is written by a certificated person who is currently working in the field of education. The state board of education shall not require these children to meet the student learning goals, learn the state learning standards, or take the assessments under RCW 28A.655.070. The standardized test administered or the annual academic progress assessment written shall be made a part of the child's permanent records. If, as a result of the annual test or assessment, it is determined that the child is not making reasonable progress consistent with his or her age or stage of development, the parent shall make a good faith effort to remedy any deficiency.(2) A parent who does not enroll his or her child in public or private school at age six and plans to cause his or her child to receive home-based instruction by age eight must file a signed declaration of the parent's plan regarding the education of that child in the school year when the child turns six years of age and the school year when the child turns seven years of age as required by section 1 of this act.(3) Failure of a parent to comply with the duties in this section shall be deemed a failure of such parent's child to attend school without valid justification under RCW 28A.225.020. Parents who do comply with the duties set forth in this section shall be presumed to be providing home-based instruction as set forth in RCW 28A.225.010(4).--- END ---